Virginia statutes. Title 30. General Assembly.
Chapter 17. Joint Commission on Behavioral Health Care.

§§ 30-165 through 30-167.

Expired.

Cross references.

For current provisions governing Joint Commission on Health Care, see § 30-168 et seq.

Editor’s note.

This chapter was derived from former §§ 9-390 through 9-395, as enacted by Acts 2000, c. 776, and amended by Acts 2001, c. 844, and expired by its own terms on July 1, 2003. The Joint Commission on Health Care and Joint Commission on Behavioral Health were consolidated by Acts 2003, c. 633.